Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.1135

Firearms sales or transfers—Use of Washington state patrol firearms background check system.

(1) Beginning on the date that is thirty days after the Washington state patrol issues a notification to dealers that a state firearms background check system is established within the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.580, a dealer shall use the Washington state patrol firearms background check program to conduct background checks for all firearms transfers. A dealer may not sell or transfer a firearm to an individual unless the dealer first contacts the Washington state patrol firearms background check program for a background check to determine the eligibility of the purchaser or transferee to possess a firearm under state and federal law and the requirements and time periods established in RCW 9.41.090 and 9.41.092 have been satisfied.

(2) A dealer shall charge a purchaser or transferee a background check fee in an amount determined by the Washington state patrol and remit the proceeds from the fee to the Washington state patrol on a monthly basis. The background check fee does not apply to any background check conducted in connection with a pawnbroker's receipt of a pawned firearm or the redemption of a pawned firearm.

(3) This section does not apply to sales or transfers to licensed dealers or to the sale or transfer of an antique firearm.

[ 2023 c 161 s 9; 2020 c 28 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 161: See note following RCW 9.41.090.